Nebraska, session 109, LB1222.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1222 LB1222
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) No later than January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding
section 44-3,131, (a) an individual or group sickness and accident
insurance policy or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state and a hospital, medical, or surgical expense-
incurred policy, except a policy that provides coverage for a specified
disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and (b) a self-funded employee
benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law shall provide
coverage for medically necessary treatment related to, or as a result of,
an acquired brain injury.
(2) Such coverage shall not include a lifetime limitation or annual
limitation which is inconsistent with generally accepted standards of
medical necessity or established clinical guidelines for brain injury
rehabilitation. A limitation on inpatient rehabilitation services shall
be separate from, and shall not be included in, a limitation on post-
acute rehabilitation including outpatient day treatment, residential
rehabilitation, or community reintegration. A limitation shall be
separately stated by the insurer. The benefits in this section shall not
be subject to a greater deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or out-of-
pocket limit than any other benefit provided by the insurer under a
comprehensive health insurance policy.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 3 of this act:
(1) Acquired brain injury means an injury to the brain which occurs
after birth and can be caused by an infectious disease, a metabolic
disorder, an endocrine disorder, diminished oxygen, a brain tumor, a
toxin, a disease that affects the blood supply to the brain, a stroke, or
a traumatic brain injury;
(2) Adverse determination means a determination by a clinical peer
reviewer, based on the clinical information provided, that an admission,
extension of stay, or another covered acquired brain injury service is
not medically necessary;
(3) Cognitive communication therapy means treatment that addresses
-2-

LB1222 LB1222
2026 2026
an individual's communication problems that have an underlying cause in
one or more cognitive deficits rather than a deficit in primary language
or speech;
(4) Cognitive rehabilitation therapy means a process of re-learning
cognitive skills essential for daily living through coordinated,
specialized, integrated therapeutic treatments that are provided in
dynamic settings designed for efficient and effective re-learning
following damage to brain cells or brain chemistry due to brain injury;
(5) Community reintegration services means services that provide
incremental guided real-world therapeutic training to develop skills
essential for an individual to participate in life, re-enter employment,
attend school and engage in other productive activity, safely live
independently, and participate in the community while avoiding re-
hospitalization and long-term support needs;
(6) Functional rehabilitation therapy means a structured approach
that emphasizes learning by doing, and focuses re-learning a specific
task in a prescribed format with maximum opportunity for repeated correct
practice. Compensatory strategies are developed for each skill that is
persistently impaired and each individual is trained on daily
implementation. To ensure acquisition and use, focus is set on re-
learning those skills essential for safe daily living in home and
community-based settings;
(7) Insurer has the same meaning as defined in section 44-103;
(8) Medical necessity or medically necessary treatment means
services that are consistent with generally accepted principles of
professional medical practice and includes, but is not limited to, (a)
cognitive rehabilitation therapy; (b) cognitive communication therapy;
(c) neurocognitive therapy and rehabilitation; (d) neurobehavioral,
neurophysiological, and neuropsychological therapy and testing; (e)
neurofeedback therapy; (f) functional rehabilitation therapy; (g)
community reintegration services; (h) post-acute residential treatment
-3-

LB1222 LB1222
2026 2026
services; (i) inpatient services; (j) outpatient and day treatment
services; and (k) home and community-based treatment;
(9) Neurobehavioral therapy means a set of medical and therapeutic
assessment and treatments focused on behavioral impairments associated
with brain disease or injury and the amelioration of such impairments
through the development of pro-social behavior;
(10) Neurocognitive therapy means treatment of a disorder in which
the primary clinical deficit is in cognitive function that has not been
present since birth and is a decline from a previously attained level of
function;
(11) Neurofeedback therapy means a direct training of brain function
to enhance self-regulatory capacity or an individual's ability to exert
control over behavior, thoughts, and feelings. It is a form of
biofeedback whereby a patient can learn to control brain activity that is
measured and recorded by an electroencephalogram;
(12) Neuropsychological testing means the administration of a
comprehensive battery of tests to evaluate neurocognitive, behavioral,
and emotional strengths and weaknesses and their relationship to abnormal
central nervous system functioning; and
(13) Post-acute residential treatment means integrated medical and
therapeutic services, treatment, education, and skills-training provided
in a home and community-based setting. Such treatment is designed to
create the maximum opportunity for correct practice of the skill in the
context of use to develop new neural pathways to enable the individual to
avoid re-hospitalization and long-term care.
Sec. 3. (1) The Department of Insurance shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to implement sections 1 to 3 of this act and shall
create a process to permit an expedited appeal of an adverse
determination by an insurer for acquired brain injury services covered
under section 1 of this act. An expedited appeal shall be resolved within
five business days of the date such appeal is filed with the department.
-4-

LB1222 LB1222
2026 2026
Coverage for ongoing rehabilitation shall continue until such appeal is
resolved if the treating clinician determines that the interruption of
rehabilitation would risk regression.
(2) The department shall monitor compliance with sections 1 to 3 of
this act and shall publish an annual report on its website that
summarizes coverage determinations, coverage denials, and appeals related
to the denial of coverage for acquired brain injury services required by
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. No later than January 1, 2028, and notwithstanding section
44-3,131, (a) any individual or group sickness and accident insurance
policy or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred
policy, except for policies that provide coverage for a specified disease
or other limited-benefit coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee
benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law shall provide
coverage for all medically necessary diagnostic testing and treatment or
medication approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration
prescribed to slow the progression of Alzheimer's disease or another
related dementia. Coverage of the treatment and medication described in
this section shall not be subject to step-therapy.
Sec. 5. No later than January 1, 2028, the medical assistance
program shall provide coverage for all medically necessary diagnostic
testing and treatment or medication approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration prescribed to slow the progression of Alzheimer's disease
or another related dementia. Coverage of the treatment and medication
described in this section shall not be subject to step-therapy.
-5-